Utah statutes.
63M-1-2707.   Duties.

The board shall:

(1)  make recommendations to the office on requirements for the requisite certification of each business resource center and staff at each center by the executive director;

(2)  make recommendations to the office for certification of the business plans the board is required to review under Subsection 63M-1-2704(5)(c)(iii);

(3)  if requested by the executive director, assist the office in providing operational oversight to and coordination of the business resource centers established under this part;

(4)  identify issues and make recommendations to the office regarding programs, policies, and procedures that could be implemented by business resource centers in fulfilling their duties and responsibilities under Section 63M-1-2705;

(5)  make budget recommendations to the office regarding the operation and staffing of business resource centers established under this part;

(6)  recommend matching fund exceptions under Subsection 63M-1-2704(3);

(7)  recommend certification of all non-state funded satellite business resource centers; and

(8)  establish metrics to report the performance of economic development output in each region serviced by a business resource center.

